Massachusetts, session 194th, S1176.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of Chapter 123 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition
is hereby amended by striking the following paragraph (e):-
(e) Any person may make an application to a district court justice or a justice of the
juvenile court department for a 3-day commitment to a facility of a person with a mental illness
if the failure to confine said person would cause a likelihood of serious harm. The court shall
appoint counsel to represent said person. After hearing such evidence as the court may consider
sufficient, a district court justice or a justice of the juvenile court department may issue a warrant
for the apprehension and appearance before the court of the alleged person with a mental illness
if in the court's judgment the condition or conduct of such person makes such action necessary or
proper. Following apprehension, the court shall have the person examined by a physician or a
qualified advanced practice registered nurse designated to have the authority to admit to a facility
or examined by a qualified psychologist in accordance with the regulations of the department. If
of 2

the physician, qualified advanced practice registered nurse or qualified psychologist reports that
the failure to hospitalize the person would create a likelihood of serious harm by reason of
mental illness, the court may order the person committed to a facility for a period not to exceed 3
days; provided, however, that the superintendent may discharge said person at any time within
the 3-day period. The periods of time prescribed or allowed under this section shall be computed
pursuant to Rule 6 of the Massachusetts Rules of Civil Procedure.
of 2